Wyoming, session 2026, SF0087.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 6-5-204(b) is amended to read:

6-5-204. Interference with peace officer; disarming
peace officer; penalties.

(b) A person who intentionally and knowingly causes
or attempts to cause, or who in the course of violating
subsection (a) of this section causes, bodily injury to a
SF0087

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0446
peace officer while that peace officer is engaged in the
lawful performance of his official duties is guilty of a
felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten
(10) years.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0087